Utah statutes.
16-10a-1532.   Appeal from revocation.

(1)  A foreign corporation may appeal the division's revocation of its authority to transact business in this state to the district court of the county in this state where the last registered or principal office of the corporation was located or in Salt Lake County, within 30 days after the notice of revocation is mailed under Section 16-10a-1531. The foreign corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the corporation's application for authority to transact business, and any amended applications, each as filed with the division, and the division's notice of revocation.

(2)  The court may summarily order the division to reinstate the authority of the foreign corporation to transact business in this state or it may take any other action it considers appropriate.

(3)  The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

